Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB338.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP 2 Section 1. GENERAL FUND. 3 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 4 to the department of agriculture and land stewardship for the 5 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, 6 the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 7 used for the purposes designated: 8 For purposes of supporting the department, including its 9 divisions, for administration, regulation, and programs; for 10 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes; and 11 for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20,377,294 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 420.00 14 2. Of the amount appropriated in subsection 1, the following 15 amount is transferred to Iowa state university of science and 16 technology, to be used for the universityâs midwest grape and 17 wine industry institute: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 325,000 19 3. The department shall submit a report each quarter of 20 the fiscal year to the general assembly and the department 21 of management. The report shall describe in detail the 22 expenditure of moneys appropriated in this section to support 23 the departmentâs administration, regulation, and programs. 24 Sec. 2. UNCLAIMED PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING WINNINGS ââ 25 HORSE AND DOG RACING. There is appropriated from the moneys 26 available under section 99D.13 to the department of agriculture 27 and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 28 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so 29 much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 30 designated: 31 For purposes of supporting the departmentâs administration 32 and enforcement of horse and dog racing law pursuant to section 33 99D.22 , including for salaries, support, maintenance, and 34 miscellaneous purposes: 35 -1- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 1/ 38 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 305,516 1 Sec. 3. RENEWABLE FUEL INFRASTRUCTURE FUND ââ MOTOR 2 FUEL INSPECTION. There is appropriated from the renewable 3 fuel infrastructure fund created in section 159A.16 to the 4 department of agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal 5 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 6 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 7 used for the purposes designated: 8 For purposes of the inspection of motor fuel, including 9 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 11 Sec. 4. SKILLED WORKER AND JOB CREATION FUND ââ BUTCHERY 12 INNOVATION AND REVITALIZATION PROGRAM. 13 1. There is appropriated from the Iowa skilled worker and 14 job creation fund created in section 8.57J to the department of 15 agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning 16 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, 17 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 18 designated: 19 For support of the butchery innovation and revitalization 20 program established pursuant to 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 21 1148, section 28, to award financial assistance to eligible 22 businesses for projects based on criteria described in section 23 15E.370: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 249,695 25 2. The department may use not more than 5 percent of the 26 moneys appropriated in subsection 1 to pay for the costs of 27 administering the program described in subsection 1. 28 3. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 29 subsection 1 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 30 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 31 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 32 close of the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027. 33 Sec. 5. SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS FROM GENERAL FUND TO 34 DEPARTMENT. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 35 -2- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 2/ 38 H.F. _____ state to the department of agriculture and land stewardship 1 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 2 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 3 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 4 1. DAIRY REGULATION 5 a. For purposes of performing functions pursuant to section 6 192.109 , including conducting a survey of grade âAâ milk and 7 certifying the results to the secretary of agriculture: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 189,196 9 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 10 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 11 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 12 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 13 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 14 2. LOCAL FOOD AND FARM PROGRAM 15 a. For purposes of supporting the local food and farm 16 program pursuant to chapter 267A : 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 125,000 18 b. Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, $50,000 is 19 allocated to the department to support a project conducted by 20 Iowa state university of science and technology to study the 21 ability of the choose Iowa food program, created under section 22 187.304, as enacted by this Act, to serve rural grocers. 23 c. The department shall enter into a cost-sharing agreement 24 with Iowa state university of science and technology to support 25 the local food and farm program coordinator position as part of 26 the universityâs cooperative extension service in agriculture 27 and home economics pursuant to chapter 267A . 28 d. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 29 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 30 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 31 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 32 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 33 3. AGRICULTURAL EDUCATION 34 a. For purposes of allocating moneys to an Iowa association 35 -3- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 3/ 38 H.F. _____ affiliated with a national organization that promotes 1 agricultural education providing for future farmers: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 150,000 3 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 4 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 5 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 6 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 7 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 8 4. FOREIGN ANIMAL DISEASES AFFLICTING LIVESTOCK 9 For deposit in the foreign animal disease preparedness and 10 response fund created in section 163.3B to further implement a 11 foreign animal disease preparedness and response strategy as 12 described in section 163.3C: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,250,000 14 5. FARMERS WITH DISABILITIES PROGRAM 15 a. For purposes of supporting a program for farmers with 16 disabilities: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 230,000 18 b. The moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be 19 used for the public purpose of providing a grant to a national 20 nonprofit organization with over 80 years of experience in 21 assisting children and adults with disabilities and special 22 needs. The moneys shall be used to support a nationally 23 recognized program that began in 1986 and has been replicated 24 in at least 30 other states, but is not available through 25 any other entity in this state, and that provides assistance 26 to farmers with disabilities in all 99 counties to allow the 27 farmers to remain in their own homes and be gainfully engaged 28 in farming through provision of agricultural worksite and home 29 modification consultations, peer support services, services 30 to families, information and referral, and equipment loan 31 services. 32 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 33 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 34 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 35 -4- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 4/ 38 H.F. _____ available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 1 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 2 6. LOESS HILLS DEVELOPMENT AND CONSERVATION FUND 3 a. For deposit in the loess hills development and 4 conservation fund created pursuant to section 161D.2 : 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 6 b. (1) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, 7 $270,000 shall be allocated to the fundâs hungry canyons 8 account. 9 (2) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys allocated in this 10 paragraph may be used for administrative costs. 11 c. (1) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, 12 $30,000 shall be allocated to the fundâs loess hills alliance 13 account. 14 (2) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys allocated in this 15 paragraph may be used for administrative costs. 16 7. SOUTHERN IOWA DEVELOPMENT AND CONSERVATION FUND 17 a. For deposit in the southern Iowa development and 18 conservation fund created pursuant to section 161D.12: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 20 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in 21 this subsection may be used for administrative costs. 22 8. GRAIN REGULATION 23 For the administration and enforcement of chapters 203 24 and 203C , including salaries, support, maintenance, and 25 miscellaneous purposes: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 350,000 27 9. CHOOSE IOWA FUND 28 a. For deposit in the choose Iowa fund created in section 29 187.201: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,813,000 31 b. (1) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, 32 the department shall use at least $500,000 to support the 33 value-added agricultural grant program created in section 34 187.321. 35 -5- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 5/ 38 H.F. _____ (2) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, the 1 department may use up to $813,000 to support the choose Iowa 2 promotional program as provided in chapter 187, subchapter III, 3 part 1. 4 (3) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, the 5 department shall use at least $500,000 to support the dairy 6 innovation and revitalization program created in section 7 187.311. 8 c. The department may increase or decrease the amount of 9 moneys used to support a program described in paragraph âbâ 10 based on the amount of moneys awarded to persons participating 11 in the program. The department shall publish a notice of the 12 departmentâs action to increase or decrease the amount on the 13 departmentâs internet site where the programs are advertised at 14 least thirty days prior to the day that the department takes 15 such action. 16 10. CHOOSE IOWA FOOD PURCHASING PROGRAM 17 a. For purposes of supporting the choose Iowa food 18 purchasing program to assist eligible participants in 19 purchasing qualified food products pursuant to section 187.304, 20 as enacted by this Act: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 22 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 23 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 24 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 25 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 26 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 27 11. MARKET REPORTING 28 a. For purposes of continuing data collection and reporting 29 for a daily grain or livestock report: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 31 b. The department shall report data at a minimum at 32 the county level and make the report available for public 33 consumption. 34 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 187.304 Choose Iowa food purchasing 35 -6- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 6/ 38 H.F. _____ program. 1 1. There is created within the department a choose Iowa food 2 purchasing program. 3 2. The department shall administer the program according to 4 all of the following: 5 a. A farm or business that owns or operates the farm 6 source shall be given a preference to participate in the 7 program if the farm or business is currently participating 8 in the choose Iowa promotional program as provided in this 9 part 1 of subchapter III. Otherwise, a farm or business may 10 participate in the program if the farm or business has applied 11 to participate in the choose Iowa promotional program and the 12 department determines that the application will be approved. 13 b. An eligible participant is limited to any Iowa food bank 14 or an Iowa emergency feeding organization, recognized by the 15 department. 16 c. A qualified food product is limited to meat and poultry, 17 dairy products, grains, flour, eggs, honey, and produce. 18 d. The department is not required to follow a requirement in 19 chapter 190A that the department determines is not practical 20 for the program. 21 3. a. Of the moneys appropriated to support the program in 22 a fiscal year, not more than one hundred fifty thousand dollars 23 shall be used to reimburse Iowa food banks and Iowa emergency 24 feeding organizations. 25 b. An eligible participant shall be reimbursed on a matching 26 basis with the department contributing one dollar for every one 27 dollar expended by the eligible participant. 28 c. An Iowa food bank or Iowa emergency feeding organization 29 shall not receive more than twenty-five thousand dollars per 30 fiscal year for participating in the program. 31 4. The department may use not more than five percent of the 32 moneys appropriated to support the program in a fiscal year to 33 pay for the costs of administering the program. 34 5. The department shall prepare and submit a report 35 -7- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 7/ 38 H.F. _____ regarding its findings and recommendations to the governor and 1 general assembly not later than January 15 of each year. 2 6. This section is repealed July 1, 2030. 3 DIVISION II 4 DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES 5 Sec. 7. GENERAL FUND. 6 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 7 to the department of natural resources for the fiscal year 8 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 9 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 10 purposes designated: 11 For purposes of supporting the department, including its 12 divisions, for administration, regulation, and programs; for 13 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes; and 14 for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,816,738 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1,145.95 17 2. Of the number of full-time equivalent positions 18 authorized to the department pursuant to subsection 1, 50.00 19 full-time equivalent positions shall be allocated by the 20 department for seasonal employees for purposes of providing 21 maintenance, upkeep, and sanitary services at state parks. 22 This subsection shall not impact conservation officer, park 23 ranger, or park manager positions within the department. 24 3. The department shall submit a report each quarter of 25 the fiscal year to the general assembly and the department 26 of management. The report shall describe in detail the 27 expenditure of moneys appropriated under this section to 28 support the departmentâs administration, regulation, and 29 programs. 30 Sec. 8. STATE FISH AND GAME PROTECTION FUND ââ REGULATION 31 AND ADVANCEMENT OF OUTDOOR ACTIVITIES. 32 1. There is appropriated from the state fish and game 33 protection fund created pursuant to section 456A.17 to the 34 department of natural resources for the fiscal year beginning 35 -8- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 8/ 38 H.F. _____ July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, 1 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 2 designated: 3 For purposes of supporting the regulation or advancement of 4 hunting, fishing, or trapping, or the protection, propagation, 5 restoration, management, or harvest of fish or wildlife, 6 including for administration, regulation, law enforcement, and 7 programs; and for salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, 8 and miscellaneous purposes: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 51,404,790 10 2. Notwithstanding section 455A.10 , the department may use 11 the unappropriated balance remaining in the state fish and game 12 protection fund to provide for the funding of health and life 13 insurance premium payments from unused sick leave balances of 14 conservation peace officers employed in a protection occupation 15 who retire, pursuant to section 97B.49B . 16 3. Notwithstanding section 455A.10 , the department may 17 use the unappropriated balance remaining in the state fish 18 and game protection fund for the fiscal year beginning July 19 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as is necessary to fund 20 salary adjustments for departmental employees for which the 21 general assembly has made an operating budget appropriation in 22 subsection 1. 23 Sec. 9. GROUNDWATER PROTECTION FUND ââ WATER QUALITY. There 24 is appropriated from the groundwater protection fund created 25 in section 455E.11 to the department of natural resources for 26 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 27 2026, from those moneys that are not allocated pursuant to 28 that section, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 29 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 30 For purposes of supporting the departmentâs protection 31 of the stateâs groundwater, including for administration, 32 regulation, and programs, and for salaries, support, 33 maintenance, equipment, and miscellaneous purposes: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,455,850 35 -9- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 9/ 38 H.F. _____ Sec. 10. SPECIAL SNOWMOBILE FUND ââ SNOWMOBILE 1 PROGRAM. There is appropriated from the special snowmobile 2 fund created under section 321G.7 to the department of natural 3 resources for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 4 ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof 5 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 6 For purposes of administering and enforcing the state 7 snowmobile programs: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 9 Sec. 11. SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS FROM GENERAL FUND TO 10 DEPARTMENT. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 11 state to the department of natural resources for the fiscal 12 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 13 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 14 used for the purposes designated: 15 1. FLOODPLAIN MANAGEMENT AND DAM SAFETY 16 a. For purposes of supporting floodplain management and dam 17 safety: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,510,000 19 b. Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, up to 20 $400,000 may be used by the department to acquire or install 21 stream gages for purposes of tracking and predicting flood 22 events and for compiling necessary data to improve flood 23 frequency analysis. 24 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 25 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 26 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 27 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 28 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 29 2. FORESTRY HEALTH MANAGEMENT 30 a. For purposes of providing for forestry health management 31 programs: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 525,000 33 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 34 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 35 -10- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 10/ 38 H.F. _____ close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 1 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 2 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 3 3. STATE PARK OPERATIONS 4 For supporting operations at state parks, including 5 maintenance and repair of grounds and facilities: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 7 4. STATE PARK MAINTENANCE 8 For structural and infrastructural repairs in state parks: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 10 DIVISION III 11 IOWA STATE UNIVERSITY 12 Sec. 12. SPECIAL GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS. There is 13 appropriated from the general fund of the state to Iowa state 14 university of science and technology for the fiscal year 15 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 16 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 17 purposes designated: 18 1. VETERINARY DIAGNOSTIC LABORATORY 19 a. For purposes of supporting the college of veterinary 20 medicine for the operation of the veterinary diagnostic 21 laboratory, and for not more than the following full-time 22 equivalent positions: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,899,898 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 51.00 25 b. (1) Iowa state university of science and technology 26 shall not reduce the amount that it allocates to support the 27 college of veterinary medicine from any other source due to the 28 appropriation made in this subsection. 29 (2) Subparagraph (1) does not apply to a reduction made 30 to support the college of veterinary medicine if the same 31 percentage of reduction imposed on the college of veterinary 32 medicine is also imposed on all of Iowa state university of 33 science and technologyâs budget units. 34 c. If by June 30, 2026, Iowa state university of science 35 -11- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 11/ 38 H.F. _____ and technology fails to allocate the moneys appropriated in 1 this subsection to the college of veterinary medicine in 2 accordance with this subsection, the moneys appropriated in 3 this subsection for that fiscal year shall revert to the 4 general fund of the state. 5 2. MANAGEMENT OF PRIVATE FORESTS 6 a. For purposes of supporting the Iowa cooperative 7 extension service in agriculture and home economics in 8 providing technical support to landowners and loggers regarding 9 the management of private forests in northeast Iowa, and for 10 not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 150,000 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1.00 13 b. The department of natural resources shall cooperate with 14 the Iowa cooperative extension service in agriculture and home 15 economics in administering this subsection. 16 3. LIVESTOCK DISEASE RESEARCH 17 a. For deposit in the livestock disease research fund 18 created in section 267.8 : 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 291,390 20 b. Moneys appropriated under this subsection shall be used 21 by Iowa state university of science and technology to support 22 animal disease research in areas of importance to livestock 23 producers. 24 Sec. 13. IOWA NUTRIENT REDUCTION FUND ââ VETERINARY 25 DIAGNOSTIC LABORATORY. Notwithstanding section 466B.46, there 26 is appropriated from the Iowa nutrient research fund created 27 in section 466B.46 to Iowa state university of science and 28 technology for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 29 ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof 30 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 31 For purposes of supporting the college of veterinary 32 medicine for the operation of the veterinary diagnostic 33 laboratory: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 120,000 35 -12- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 12/ 38 H.F. _____ DIVISION IV 1 STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA 2 Sec. 14. IOWAâS CENTER FOR AGRICULTURAL SAFETY AND HEALTH 3 (I-CASH). 4 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 5 to the state university of Iowa for the fiscal year beginning 6 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, 7 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 8 designated: 9 For supporting the operations of Iowaâs center for 10 agricultural safety and health, as part of the universityâs 11 college of public health, and in cooperation with the 12 department of agriculture and land stewardship, to anticipate, 13 recognize, and prevent occupational illness and injury among 14 members of the agricultural community: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 128,154 16 2. a. As a condition of the appropriation made in 17 subsection 1, the state university of Iowa shall retain the 18 director of Iowaâs center for agricultural safety and health 19 employed on the effective date of this division of this Act for 20 at least the same number of hours for the fiscal year beginning 21 July 1, 2025, as worked by the director during the fiscal year 22 beginning July 1, 2024. 23 b. As a condition of the appropriation made in subsection 24 1, the state university of Iowa shall not reduce the amount 25 allocated to support Iowaâs center for agricultural safety and 26 health from any other source due to the appropriation made in 27 subsection 1. 28 3. If by June 30, 2026, the state university of Iowa fails 29 to use the moneys appropriated in subsection 1 in accordance 30 with the purposes and conditions of subsections 1 and 2, any 31 unencumbered or unobligated moneys appropriated in subsection 32 1 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 33 30, 2026, shall revert to the general fund of the state. In 34 addition, if moneys revert as required pursuant to section 35 -13- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 13/ 38 H.F. _____ 8.33 , the state university of Iowa shall transfer to the 1 general fund of the state from any otherwise unencumbered or 2 unobligated moneys from any other general fund appropriation or 3 from any moneys available from other funding sources an amount 4 equal to the amount appropriated in subsection 1 less any 5 amount that reverted to the general fund of the state pursuant 6 to section 8.33 . 7 Sec. 15. IOWA GEOLOGICAL SURVEY ââ GROUNDWATER PLANNING AND 8 RESOURCE ASSESSMENT PROJECT. 9 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 10 to the state university of Iowa for the fiscal year beginning 11 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, 12 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 13 designated: 14 For purposes of supporting a groundwater planning and 15 resource assessment project to be administered by the Iowa 16 geological survey of the state as created pursuant to section 17 456.1: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 19 2. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be used 20 by the Iowa geological survey to map and assess the condition 21 of this stateâs aquifers. The Iowa geological survey may 22 measure the volume of groundwater that is available for various 23 uses, the current and predicted allocations of groundwater to 24 support those uses, the recharge rate for the aquifers, and 25 the development of models for budgeting this stateâs water 26 resources. 27 3. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 28 subsection 1 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 29 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 30 available for expenditure for the purposes designated in 31 subsection 1. 32 DIVISION V 33 ENVIRONMENT FIRST FUND ââ GENERAL APPROPRIATIONS 34 Sec. 16. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND 35 -14- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 14/ 38 H.F. _____ STEWARDSHIP. There is appropriated from the environment first 1 fund created in section 8.57A to the department of agriculture 2 and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 3 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so 4 much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 5 designated: 6 1. CONSERVATION RESERVE ENHANCEMENT PROGRAM (CREP) 7 a. For the conservation reserve enhancement program to 8 restore and construct wetlands for the purposes of intercepting 9 tile line runoff, reducing nutrient loss, improving water 10 quality, and enhancing agricultural production practices: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 12 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated 13 in paragraph âaâ may be used for costs of administration and 14 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 15 c. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 16 department may use moneys appropriated in this subsection, 17 in combination with other appropriate environment first 18 fund appropriations, for cost sharing to match United States 19 department of agriculture, natural resources conservation 20 service, wetlands reserve enhancement program (WREP) funding 21 available to Iowa. 22 2. WATERSHED PROTECTION 23 a. For continuation of a program that provides 24 multiobjective resource protections for flood control, water 25 quality, erosion control, and natural resource conservation: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 900,000 27 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated 28 in paragraph âaâ may be used for costs of administration and 29 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 30 3. CONSERVATION RESERVE PROGRAM (CRP) 31 a. To encourage and assist farmers in enrolling in and the 32 implementation of the federal conservation reserve program and 33 to work with them to enhance their revegetation efforts to 34 improve water quality and habitat: 35 -15- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 15/ 38 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 900,000 1 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated 2 in paragraph âaâ may be used for costs of administration and 3 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 4 4. SOIL AND WATER CONSERVATION 5 a. For use by the department in providing for soil and water 6 conservation: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,325,000 8 b. (1) Of the amount appropriated in paragraph âaâ, for 9 transfer to the hungry canyons account of the loess hills 10 development and conservation fund created in section 161D.2 : 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 140,000 12 (2) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys transferred in 13 subparagraph (1) may be used for administrative costs. 14 c. Of the remaining amount appropriated in paragraph âaâ, 15 for use by the department in providing for soil and water 16 conservation administration, the conservation of soil and 17 water resources, or the support of soil and water conservation 18 districts: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,185,000 20 d. Of the amount appropriated in paragraph âcâ that the 21 department allocates to a soil and water conservation district, 22 the first $15,000 may be expended by the district for the 23 purpose of providing financial incentives under section 161A.73 24 to establish management practices for the control of soil 25 erosion on land that is row-cropped, including but not limited 26 to nontill planting, ridge-till planting, and contouring 27 strip-cropping. Of any remaining amount of that appropriation 28 allocated by the department to a district, 30 percent may be 29 expended by the district for that same purpose. 30 e. Not more than 5 percent of the moneys appropriated in 31 paragraph âcâ may be allocated for cost sharing to address 32 complaints filed under section 161A.47 . 33 f. Of the moneys appropriated in paragraph âcâ, 5 percent 34 shall be allocated for financial incentives to establish 35 -16- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 16/ 38 H.F. _____ practices to protect watersheds above publicly owned lakes of 1 the state from soil erosion and sediment as provided in section 2 161A.73 . 3 g. The division of soil conservation and water quality 4 created within the department pursuant to section 159.5 may 5 allocate moneys appropriated in paragraph âcâ to conduct 6 research and demonstration projects to promote conservation 7 tillage and nonpoint source pollution control practices. 8 h. The allocation of moneys as financial incentives as 9 provided in section 161A.73 may be used in combination with 10 moneys allocated by the department of natural resources. 11 i. Not more than 15 percent of the moneys appropriated 12 in paragraph âcâ may be used for costs of administration and 13 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 14 5. SOIL AND WATER CONSERVATION ââ ADMINISTRATION 15 a. For use by the department for costs of administration and 16 implementation of soil and water conservation practices: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,800,000 18 b. Of the moneys appropriated in paragraph âaâ, $150,000 19 is allocated to support field staff providing technical 20 assistance. 21 Sec. 17. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES. There is 22 appropriated from the environment first fund created in section 23 8.57A to the department of natural resources for the fiscal 24 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 25 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 26 used for the purposes designated: 27 1. STATE PARK MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS 28 For regular maintenance and operations of state parks and 29 staff time associated with these activities: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,235,000 31 2. GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM (GIS) 32 To provide local watershed managers with geographic 33 information system data for their use in developing, 34 monitoring, and displaying results of their watershed work: 35 -17- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 17/ 38 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 195,000 1 3. WATER QUALITY MONITORING 2 For continuing the establishment and operation of water 3 quality monitoring stations: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,955,000 5 4. PUBLIC WATER SUPPLY SYSTEM ACCOUNT 6 For deposit in the public water supply system account of the 7 water quality protection fund created in section 455B.183A : 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 9 5. REGULATION OF ANIMAL FEEDING OPERATIONS 10 For the regulation of animal feeding operations, including 11 as provided for in chapters 459 , 459A , and 459B : 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,320,000 13 6. FLOODPLAIN MANAGEMENT AND DAM SAFETY 14 For supporting floodplain management and dam safety: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 375,000 16 7. AMBIENT AIR QUALITY 17 For the abatement, control, and prevention of ambient 18 air pollution in this state, including measures as necessary 19 to assure attainment and maintenance of ambient air quality 20 standards from particulate matter: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 425,000 22 Sec. 18. STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA ââ IOWA GEOLOGICAL 23 SURVEY. There is appropriated from the environment first 24 fund created in section 8.57A to the state university of Iowa 25 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 26 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 27 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 28 1. IOWA GEOLOGICAL SURVEY OPERATIONS 29 For purposes of supporting the operations of the Iowa 30 geological survey of the state as created within the state 31 university of Iowa pursuant to section 456.1 , including but not 32 limited to providing analysis; data maintenance, collection, 33 and compilation; investigative programs; and information for 34 water supply development and protection: 35 -18- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 18/ 38 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 1 2. WATER RESOURCE MANAGEMENT 2 For purposes of supporting the Iowa geological survey in 3 measuring, assessing, and evaluating the quantity of water 4 sources in this state and assisting the department of natural 5 resources in regulating water quantity as provided in chapter 6 455B, subchapter III, part 4 , pursuant to sections 455B.262B 7 and 456.14 : 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 495,000 9 Sec. 19. REVERSION. 10 1. a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ, and 11 notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated for the 12 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, in this division of this 13 Act that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of 14 the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available 15 for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of 16 the succeeding fiscal year, or until the project for which the 17 appropriation was made is completed, whichever is earlier. 18 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated for 19 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, in this division of 20 this Act to the department of agriculture and land stewardship 21 to provide financial assistance for the establishment of 22 permanent soil and water conservation practices that remain 23 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year 24 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure 25 for the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year 26 beginning July 1, 2028. 27 2. Subsection 1 does not apply to moneys transferred 28 pursuant to this division of this Act to the loess hills 29 development and conservation fund created in section 161D.2 , 30 which shall not revert as provided in that section. 31 DIVISION VI 32 ENVIRONMENT FIRST FUND ââ SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS 33 Sec. 20. WATER QUALITY INITIATIVE ââ DEPARTMENT OF 34 AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP. 35 -19- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 19/ 38 H.F. _____ 1. There is appropriated from the environment first fund 1 created in section 8.57A to the department of agriculture 2 and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 3 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so 4 much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 5 designated: 6 For deposit in the water quality initiative fund created in 7 section 466B.45 , for purposes of supporting the water quality 8 initiative administered by the division of soil conservation 9 and water quality as provided in section 466B.42 , including 10 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,375,000 12 2. a. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be 13 used to support projects in subwatersheds as designated by the 14 division that are part of high-priority watersheds identified 15 by the water resources coordinating council established 16 pursuant to section 466B.3 . 17 b. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be used to 18 support projects in watersheds generally, including regional 19 watersheds, as designated by the division and high-priority 20 watersheds identified by the water resources coordinating 21 council established pursuant to section 466B.3 . 22 3. In supporting projects in subwatersheds and watersheds 23 as provided in subsection 2, all of the following apply: 24 a. The demonstration projects shall utilize water quality 25 practices as described in the Iowa nutrient reduction strategy 26 as defined in section 455B.171 . 27 b. The division shall implement demonstration projects as 28 provided in paragraph âaâ by providing for participation by 29 persons who hold a legal interest in agricultural land used in 30 farming. To every extent practical, the division shall provide 31 for collaborative participation by such persons who hold a 32 legal interest in agricultural land located within the same 33 subwatershed. 34 c. The division shall implement a demonstration project on 35 -20- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 20/ 38 H.F. _____ a cost-share basis as determined by the division. However, 1 except for edge-of-field practices, the stateâs share of the 2 amount shall not exceed 50 percent of the estimated cost of 3 establishing the practice as determined by the division or 4 50 percent of the actual cost of establishing the practice, 5 whichever is less. 6 d. The demonstration projects shall be used to educate other 7 persons about the feasibility and value of establishing similar 8 water quality practices. The division shall promote field day 9 events for purposes of allowing interested persons to establish 10 water quality practices on their agricultural land. 11 e. The division shall conduct water quality evaluations 12 within supported subwatersheds. Within a reasonable period 13 after accumulating information from such evaluations, the 14 division shall create an aggregated database of water quality 15 practices. Any information identifying a person holding a 16 legal interest in agricultural land or specific agricultural 17 land shall be a confidential record under section 22.7 . 18 4. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be used 19 to support education and outreach in a manner that encourages 20 persons who hold a legal interest in agricultural land used for 21 farming to implement water quality practices, including the 22 establishment of such practices in watersheds generally, and 23 not limited to subwatersheds or high-priority watersheds. 24 5. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 may be used 25 to contract with persons to coordinate the implementation of 26 efforts provided in this section. 27 6. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 may be used by 28 the department to support urban soil and water conservation 29 efforts, which may include but are not limited to management 30 practices related to bioretention, landscaping, the use of 31 permeable or pervious pavement, and soil quality restoration. 32 The moneys shall be allocated on a cost-share basis as provided 33 in chapter 161A . 34 7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 35 -21- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 21/ 38 H.F. _____ contrary, the department may use moneys appropriated in 1 subsection 1 to carry out the provisions of this section on a 2 cost-share basis in combination with other moneys available to 3 the department from a state or federal source. 4 8. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in 5 this section may be used to pay for the costs of administering 6 and implementing the water quality initiative by the 7 departmentâs division of soil conservation and water quality as 8 provided in section 466B.42 and this section. 9 DIVISION VII 10 RESOURCES ENHANCEMENT AND PROTECTION ââ OPEN SPACES 11 Sec. 21. REAP ââ IN LIEU OF GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATION. In 12 lieu of the standing appropriation in section 455A.18 , there is 13 appropriated from the environment first fund created in section 14 8.57A to the Iowa resources enhancement and protection fund 15 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 16 30, 2026, the following amount, to be allocated as provided in 17 section 455A.19 : 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,000,000 19 Sec. 22. REAP ââ OPEN SPACES ACCOUNT ââ STATE PARK 20 MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS, AND FACILITY REFURBISHMENT. 21 Notwithstanding section 455A.19, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ, 22 subparagraph (1), of the moneys allocated to the open spaces 23 account of the Iowa resources enhancement and protection fund, 24 up to $1,000,000 may be used by the department of natural 25 resources for state park maintenance, development, operations, 26 and facility refurbishment for the fiscal year beginning July 27 1, 2025, and ending on June 30, 2026. 28 Sec. 23. Section 455A.18, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 29 2025, is amended to read as follows: 30 a. For each fiscal year of the fiscal period beginning 31 July 1, 1997, and ending June 30, 2026 2031 , there is 32 appropriated from the general fund, to the Iowa resources 33 enhancement and protection fund, the amount of twenty million 34 dollars, to be used as provided in this chapter . However, 35 -22- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 22/ 38 H.F. _____ in any fiscal year of the fiscal period, if moneys from the 1 lottery are appropriated by the state to the fund, the amount 2 appropriated under this subsection shall be reduced by the 3 amount appropriated from the lottery. 4 DIVISION VIII 5 ANIMAL DISEASE PREPAREDNESS AND RESPONSE 6 Sec. 24. IOWA ANIMAL DISEASE PREVENTION FUND ââ SPECIAL 7 APPROPRIATIONS. 8 1. There is appropriated from the Iowa animal disease 9 prevention fund created in section 165.18, as amended by this 10 Act, to the department of agriculture and land stewardship for 11 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 12 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 13 to be used for the purposes designated: 14 a. For purposes of purchasing and maintaining equipment 15 to further the implementation of the foreign animal disease 16 preparedness and response strategy developed under section 17 163.3C: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 19 b. For purposes of assisting in the development of vaccines 20 against foreign animal diseases by a company based in Iowa that 21 develops livestock and other animal vaccines: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 23 c. (1) For purposes of providing grants to assist livestock 24 producers in employing technologies or practices that deter 25 and drive away bird species known to be a reservoir for highly 26 pathogenic avian influenza and for repairing or renovating 27 buildings to prevent the intrusion of species that may carry 28 highly pathogenic avian influenza: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 30 (2) The moneys appropriated in subparagraph (1) shall 31 be distributed by the department through the issuance of 32 grants to livestock producers pursuant to all of the following 33 conditions: 34 (a) A livestock producer shall submit an application to the 35 -23- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 23/ 38 H.F. _____ department that shall include all of the following information: 1 (i) The requested grant amount. 2 (ii) The amount the livestock producer has spent or plans to 3 spend on projects under subparagraph (1). 4 (iii) A general description of the project. 5 (iv) Any other information the department deems necessary. 6 (b) The department shall not approve a grant application 7 unless the livestock producer contributes to the project an 8 amount that is at least one dollar for every dollar provided 9 by the grant. At the request of the department, the livestock 10 producer shall provide proof of expenditures for the project. 11 (c) An applicant shall not receive more than $5,000 in 12 grants issued pursuant to this paragraph. 13 d. For purposes of upgrading information technology 14 resources used by the department: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 450,000 16 2. There is appropriated from the Iowa animal disease 17 prevention fund created in section 165.18, as amended by this 18 Act, to Iowa state university of science and technology for the 19 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, 20 the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 21 used for the purposes designated: 22 a. To assist the college of veterinary medicine veterinary 23 diagnostic laboratory in installing and moving equipment into 24 its refurbished facility: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 26 b. (1) For deposit in the livestock disease research fund 27 created in section 267.8: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 29 (2) Moneys appropriated under this paragraph shall be used 30 by Iowa state university of science and technology to support 31 animal disease research in areas of importance to livestock 32 producers. 33 Sec. 25. Section 159.5, subsection 11, paragraph a, 34 subparagraph (5), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 35 -24- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 24/ 38 H.F. _____ subparagraph. 1 Sec. 26. Section 163.3B, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 2 to read as follows: 3 3. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department and 4 shall be used exclusively to develop, establish, and implement 5 for the following purposes: 6 a. Developing, establishing, and implementing a foreign 7 animal disease preparedness and response strategy as described 8 in section 163.3C , and shall not require further special 9 authorization by the general assembly . 10 b. Supporting activities related to animal health and 11 disease response that strengthen the stateâs overall ability 12 to prevent, prepare for, and respond to emerging or reemerging 13 animal diseases, including but not limited to salaries, 14 support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes. 15 Sec. 27. Section 163.10, Code 2025, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 163.10 Quarantining or destroying animals. 18 The department may quarantine or destroy any animal exposed 19 to or afflicted with an infectious or contagious disease. 20 However, cattle exposed to or infected with tuberculosis shall 21 not be destroyed without the ownerâs consent, unless there 22 are sufficient moneys to reimburse the owner for the cattle, 23 which may be paid as an expense authorized as provided in 24 section 163.15 , from moneys in the brucellosis and tuberculosis 25 eradication fund created in section 165.18 , or from moneys made 26 available by the United States department of agriculture. 27 Sec. 28. Section 164.6, Code 2025, is amended to read as 28 follows: 29 164.6 Expense of test. 30 The expense for an inspection and official test of a 31 designated animal other than for bovine animals shall be borne 32 by the owner. If the designated animal is a bovine animal, and 33 the owner agrees to comply with and carry out the provisions 34 of this chapter and the rules adopted by the department under 35 -25- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 25/ 38 H.F. _____ section 164.4 , the expense of the inspection and test shall be 1 borne by the United States department of agriculture , or by the 2 department, or by the brucellosis and tuberculosis eradication 3 fund or any combination of these sources. 4 Sec. 29. Section 164.21, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2025, are 5 amended to read as follows: 6 2. The owner shall be indemnified to the extent that money 7 is available in the brucellosis and tuberculosis eradication 8 fund as created in section 165.18 and indemnification is also 9 made by the United States department of agriculture. However, 10 if the United States department of agriculture is unable to 11 indemnify the owner, the department may indemnify the owner, if 12 money is moneys are available. 13 3. In the case of individual payment, all cattle shall 14 be individually appraised and the amount of indemnity shall 15 be equal to the difference between the slaughter value and 16 the appraisal price, less the amount of indemnity paid by 17 the United States department of agriculture. Bison shall 18 be appraised as if the bison are beef cattle. The total 19 amount of indemnity paid by the brucellosis and tuberculosis 20 eradication fund for a grade animal or a purebred animal shall 21 not exceed two hundred dollars. However, if If purebred cattle 22 are purchased and owned for at least one year before testing 23 and the owner can verify the actual cost, the department may 24 further indemnify the owner. The amount of the indemnification 25 shall not exceed five hundred fifty dollars or the actual cost 26 of the animal when purchased, whichever is less. 27 Sec. 30. Section 165.18, Code 2025, is amended to read as 28 follows: 29 165.18 Brucellosis and tuberculosis eradication Iowa animal 30 disease prevention fund. 31 1. A brucellosis and tuberculosis eradication fund is 32 created in the office of the secretary of agriculture, to be 33 used together with state and federal funds available to pay: 34 a. The indemnity and other expenses provided in this 35 -26- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 26/ 38 H.F. _____ chapter . 1 b. The indemnity as set out in section 164.21 and other 2 expenses provided in chapter 164 . 3 c. The expenses of the inspection and testing program 4 provided in chapter 163A , but only to the extent that the 5 moneys in the fund are not required for expenses incurred under 6 chapter 164 or this chapter . 7 d. Indemnities as provided in section 159.5, subsection 8 11 , but only to the extent that the moneys in the fund are not 9 required to pay expenses under chapter 163A , chapter 164 , or 10 this chapter . 11 2. If it appears to the secretary of agriculture that the 12 balance in the fund on January 20 is insufficient to carry 13 on the work in the state for the following fiscal year, the 14 secretary shall notify the board of supervisors of each county 15 to levy an amount sufficient to pay the expenses estimated to 16 be incurred under subsection 1 for the following fiscal year, 17 subject to a maximum levy of thirty-three and three-fourths 18 cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of all taxable 19 property in the county. 20 3. Not later than December 15 or June 15 of a year in which 21 the tax is collected, the county treasurer shall transmit the 22 amount of the tax levied and collected to the treasurer of 23 state, who shall credit it to the brucellosis and tuberculosis 24 eradication fund. 25 1. An Iowa animal disease prevention fund is created in 26 the state treasury under the control and management of the 27 department. 28 2. The fund shall include moneys appropriated by the general 29 assembly credited to the fund. The fund may include other 30 moneys available to and obtained or accepted by the department 31 as provided in section 159.6A, including but not limited to the 32 federal government, other public sources, or private sources. 33 3. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department to 34 develop, establish, and implement an animal disease prevention 35 -27- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 27/ 38 H.F. _____ strategy. 1 4. a. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, interest or earnings 2 on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. 3 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund that 4 remain unencumbered or unobligated at the end of a fiscal year 5 shall not revert. 6 Sec. 31. Section 331.512, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 7 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 8 Sec. 32. Section 331.559, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 9 amended by striking the subsection. 10 Sec. 33. TRANSFER OF MONEYS. There is transferred from the 11 brucellosis and tuberculosis eradication fund created pursuant 12 to section 165.18, Code 2025, to the Iowa animal disease 13 prevention fund created pursuant to section 165.18, as amended 14 by this Act, all unencumbered or unobligated moneys remaining 15 on the effective date of this division of this Act. 16 DIVISION IX 17 PROCEEDS FROM SALES OF TIMBER AND REAL PROPERTY ââ EXPENDITURES 18 FOR STATE PARKS 19 Sec. 34. Section 461A.31A, Code 2025, is amended to read as 20 follows: 21 461A.31A Sale of timber. 22 1. If the estimated quantity of timber grown in a state 23 park or a preserve to be sold by the department in a sixty-day 24 period is ten thousand board feet or more or if the estimated 25 value of the timber grown in a state park or a preserve to 26 be sold by the department during the same period of time is 27 five thousand dollars or more, the department shall conduct a 28 public hearing on the proposed sale. Notice of the hearing 29 shall be published as provided in section 331.305 . After the 30 public hearing, the department may proceed with the sale of the 31 timber. 32 2. Moneys generated from the sale of timber grown in a 33 state park and sold by the department shall be deposited in 34 the state conservation fund created in section 456A.17 and are 35 -28- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 28/ 38 H.F. _____ appropriated to the department to be used for purposes of that 1 fund at the specific state park from which the moneys were 2 generated. 3 Sec. 35. Section 461A.32, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 4 amended to read as follows: 5 1. The commission may sell or exchange such parts of public 6 lands or structures under the jurisdiction of the commission as 7 in its judgment may be undesirable for conservation purposes, 8 excepting state-owned meandered lands already surveyed and 9 platted at state expense as a conservation plan and project 10 tentatively adopted and now in the process of rehabilitation 11 and development authorized by a special legislative Act. The 12 sale or exchange shall be made upon the terms, conditions , 13 or considerations as the commission may approve, whereupon 14 the secretary of state shall issue a patent therefor in the 15 manner provided by law in other cases. Moneys generated from 16 any such sale from a state park shall be deposited in the 17 state conservation fund created in section 456A.17 and are 18 appropriated to the department to be used for purposes of that 19 fund at the specific state park from which the moneys were 20 generated. The proceeds of any other such sale or exchange 21 shall become a part of the funds moneys to be expended under 22 the provisions of this chapter . 23 DIVISION X 24 MISBRANDING OF DAIRY PRODUCTS 25 Sec. 36. Section 137F.3A, subsection 1, paragraph a, 26 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 27 follows: 28 The department may employ additional full-time equivalent 29 positions to enforce the provisions of this chapter and 30 chapters 137A , 137C , 137D , and 137E , and 137H, with the 31 approval of the department of management, if either of the 32 following apply: 33 Sec. 37. Section 137F.3A, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 34 2025, is amended to read as follows: 35 -29- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 29/ 38 H.F. _____ b. Before approval may be given, the director of the 1 department of management must have determined that the expenses 2 exceed the funds budgeted by the general assembly for food 3 inspections to the department. The department may hire no more 4 than one full-time equivalent position for each six hundred 5 inspections required pursuant to this chapter and chapters 6 137A , 137C , 137D , and 137E , and 137H . 7 Sec. 38. NEW SECTION . 137F.4B Dairy products. 8 1. A regulatory authority shall not suspend or revoke a 9 license issued to a food processing plant under this chapter 10 for offering for sale or selling a food product that is 11 misbranded as a dairy product in violation of section 137H.4. 12 2. A license issued to a food processing plant under section 13 137F.4 also covers the operation of a food processing plant 14 under chapter 137H. 15 Sec. 39. NEW SECTION . 137H.1 Definitions. 16 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 17 requires: 18 1. âAgricultural food animalâ means the same as defined in 19 section 137E.1. 20 2. âDairy productâ means a food product derived from milk as 21 defined in this section. 22 3. âDepartmentâ means the department of inspections, 23 appeals, and licensing. 24 4. âFabricated dairy productâ means a food product that has 25 one or more sensory attributes that resemble a dairy product 26 but that, in lieu of being derived from milk, is derived from 27 manufactured plants or other organic materials. 28 5. âFood processing plantâ means the same as defined in 29 section 137F.1. 30 6. âFood productâ means the same as defined in section 31 137E.1. 32 7. âIdentifying dairy termâ includes but is not limited to 33 any of the following: 34 a. Any word or phrase that states, indicates, suggests, or 35 -30- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 30/ 38 H.F. _____ describes milk or a dairy product, regardless of whether the 1 word or phrase is used individually, as a portmanteau, or as a 2 compound word. 3 b. A common name for the species of the hooved agricultural 4 food animal, including but not limited to cow, sheep, or goat. 5 c. A common name for a characteristic of a species of a 6 hooved agricultural food animal based on age, breed, or sex. 7 d. A common name that a reasonable purchaser would 8 immediately and exclusively associate with a dairy product 9 prepared for sale in normal commercial channels, including but 10 not limited to butter, cheese, cream, custard, dairy, gelato, 11 ghee, milk, whey, and yogurt. 12 e. A comparable word or phrase as approved by the 13 department. 14 8. âLabelâ means a display of written, printed, or graphic 15 matter placed upon any container storing a food product that 16 is offered for sale or sold on a wholesale or retail basis, 17 regardless of whether the label is printed on the containerâs 18 packaging or a sticker affixed to the container. 19 9. âMilkâ means a food product that is the lacteal 20 secretion, practically free from colostrum, obtained by 21 the milking of one or more healthy hooved agricultural food 22 animals. 23 10. a. âQualifying termâ means a word, compound word, or 24 phrase that would clearly disclose to a reasonable purchaser of 25 dairy products from a food processing plant that a food product 26 is not a dairy product. 27 b. âQualifying termâ includes but is not limited to almond, 28 cashew, coconut, dairy-free, fake, imitation, hazelnut, hemp, 29 nut, oat, pea, plant, plant-based, quinoa, rice, soy, vegan, 30 vegetable, vegetarian, veggie, or a comparable word or phrase 31 as approved by the department. 32 11. âRegulatory authorityâ means the same as defined in 33 section 137F.1. 34 Sec. 40. NEW SECTION . 137H.2 Administration. 35 -31- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 31/ 38 H.F. _____ 1. In conducting a routine inspection of the premises of a 1 food processing plant licensed under chapter 137F, a regulatory 2 authority is not required to determine if any food product 3 located on the premises is misbranded as a dairy product as 4 provided in section 137H.3. 5 2. A regulatory authority shall inspect an inventory of 6 food products offered for sale or sold at a food processing 7 plant based on a credible complaint that the food products are 8 misbranded as dairy products as provided in section 137H.3. 9 3. A regulatory authority shall have the same powers to 10 inspect a food processing plant under this chapter as it does 11 under chapter 137F. 12 4. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 13 that are necessary or desirable to administer and enforce this 14 chapter. 15 Sec. 41. NEW SECTION . 137H.3 Misbranded food product. 16 A food product is misbranded as a dairy product if all of the 17 following apply: 18 1. a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , the food product 19 is a fabricated dairy product or the food product contains a 20 fabricated dairy product. 21 b. The food product is not misbranded as a dairy product 22 only because it contains a trace amount of one or more 23 plant-protein food products as determined by the department. 24 2. The food product is offered for sale or sold by a food 25 processing plant. 26 3. a. A label that is part of or placed on the package 27 or other container storing the food product includes an 28 identifying dairy term. 29 b. Paragraph âaâ does not apply if the label contains a 30 conspicuous and prominent qualifying term in close proximity 31 to an identifying dairy term. 32 Sec. 42. NEW SECTION . 137H.4 Prohibition ââ sale. 33 A food processing plant shall not offer for sale or sell a 34 food product that is misbranded as a dairy product as provided 35 -32- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 32/ 38 H.F. _____ in section 137H.3. 1 Sec. 43. NEW SECTION . 137H.5 Enforcement ââ stop order. 2 1. If a regulatory authority has reasonable cause to believe 3 that a food processing plant is offering for sale or selling a 4 food product that is misbranded as a dairy product in violation 5 of section 137H.4, the regulatory authority may issue a stop 6 order. Upon being issued the stop order, the food processing 7 plant shall not offer for sale or sell the food product until 8 the regulatory authority determines that the food product is or 9 is not misbranded as a dairy product. 10 2. The regulatory authority may require that the food 11 product be held by the food processing plant and be secured 12 from purchase. 13 3. If a regulatory authority determines that the food 14 product being offered for sale or sold by a food processing 15 plant is misbranded as a dairy product, the regulatory 16 authority may issue an embargo order requiring the food 17 processing plant to dispose of the misbranded dairy product 18 other than by sale to purchasers in this state. 19 4. The department, the attorney general, or the county 20 attorney in the county where the food product is being offered 21 for sale or sold may enforce the stop order or embargo order by 22 petitioning the district court of that county. 23 Sec. 44. NEW SECTION . 137H.6 Violation ââ misbranding ââ 24 civil penalty. 25 1. A food processing plant shall not misbrand a food product 26 as a dairy product as provided in section 137H.3 as determined 27 by the department. 28 2. A food processing plant violating subsection 1 is subject 29 to a civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars, not 30 to exceed ten thousand dollars total for violations arising 31 out of the same transaction or occurrence. Each day that a 32 violation continues constitutes a separate offense. 33 3. The department shall impose the civil penalty provided 34 in subsection 2. A food processing plant may contest the 35 -33- LSB 1001YC (17) 91 sb/js 33/ 38 H.F. _____ imposition of the civil penalty by initiating a contested case 1 proceeding pursuant to chapter 17A. 2 4. Civil penalties collected under this section shall be 3 deposited in the general fund of the state. 4